Louisiana, session 2026, HB655.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 48:25 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§25. Operation or control of ferries, etc.
A. The department may take over, control, operate, maintain, and regulate
such ferries, barges, or other similar means of transportation, including any related
facilities, as it thinks determines necessary to provide adequate, safe, and efficient
transportation to the public. It may prescribe and collect such ferry charges or
transfer charges as it thinks necessary to maintain these services at rates reasonably
anticipated to generate revenue in an amount that shall not exceed the cost of the
services provided. To that end, it the department may let franchises or enter into
contracts for these services in the name of the state, alone or jointly with the parishes
or municipalities of the state, or with other states, or with the political subdivisions
of other states.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 655 ENROLLED
B. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, if the
department determines it is in the best interest of the state, contracts for the operation
or maintenance of department-owned ferries, barges, or similar means of
transportation may be let on a cost-plus basis and shall not be subject to the
provisions of R.S. 38:2221 or R.S. 48:255.4.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.